California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------

66292.3.

(a) A party to a written complaint of prohibited discrimination may appeal the action taken by the governing board of a community college district or the president of a campus of the California State University, pursuant to this article, to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or the Chancellor of the California State University, as applicable.

(b) Persons who have filed a complaint, pursuant to this chapter, with an educational institution shall be advised by the educational institution that civil law remedies, including, but not limited to, injunctions, restraining orders, or other remedies or orders, may also be available to complainants. The educational institution shall make this information available by publication in appropriate informational materials.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require an exhaustion of the appeal to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or to the Chancellor of the California State University pursuant to subdivision (a), before civil law remedies may be purchased.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who alleges that he or she is a victim of discrimination may not seek civil remedies pursuant to this section until at least 90 days have elapsed from the filing of a discrimination complaint with the local educational agency. The 90-day moratorium imposed by this subdivision does not apply to injunctive relief and is applicable only if the local educational agency has appropriately, and in a timely manner, apprised the complainant of his or her right to file a complaint.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66292.4.

This chapter may be enforced through a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 914, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

66293.

(a) Beginning after the date on which the United States Secretary of Education makes the online survey available to institutions, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, do all of the following:

(1) Develop questions in consultation with experts to determine student perspectives on campus climate.

(2) Consult with student organizations and trauma experts, including, but not limited to, nonprofit organizations with expertise in campus climate, so that the questions developed pursuant to paragraph (1)
 incorporate trauma-informed language.

(3) Submit the questions developed pursuant to paragraph (1) to the United States Secretary of Education for review and approval to be incorporated into the online survey.

(b) Beginning one year after the date on which the United States Secretary of Education makes the online survey available to institutions, and every two years thereafter, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, submit a report on the published campus-level results from the online survey to the Assembly Committee on Higher Education and the Senate Committee on Education.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions
 apply:

(1) “Campus climate” means a measure of an individual’s experience within a learning environment, specifically focusing on the current attitudes, practices, and behaviors of campus life that impact the success and retention of all members of a campus community.

(2) “Institutions” means campuses of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California.

(3) “Online survey” means the online survey tool for campus safety established by Section 1507 of Title III of Division H of Public Law 117–103.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 928, Sec. 1.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66294.

(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the California State University shall implement the recommendations provided in the California State Auditor Report 2022-109, dated July 18, 2023, including, but not limited to, by doing all of the following:

(1) Developing standardized guidelines for all formal investigations into allegations of sexual harassment by each California State University campus and the
 chancellor’s office, including how to perform and structure the analysis to establish whether sexual harassment has occurred.

(2) Developing a policy for each California State University campus and the chancellor’s office that ensures they are able to maintain a process for tracking key dates related to the timeliness of all sexual harassment cases and conducting investigations in a timely manner.

(3) Establishing systemwide requirements for each California State University campus and the chancellor’s office to address conduct that is unprofessional but does not meet the threshold of sexual harassment.

(4) Developing a policy to ensure current and former employees found to have engaged in sexual harassment,
 including those who have received less severe discipline than termination, such as suspension or demotion, are not given official positive references for employment.

(5) Requiring that each California State University campus and the chancellor’s office use the same case management system and track data consistently in their files for each sexual harassment case.

(6) Issuing comprehensive best practices, including how campuses should survey their communities and increase awareness of options for reporting sexual harassment for each California State University campus.

(7) Requiring the chancellor’s office to conduct regular compliance reviews of each California State University campus to determine whether
 they are complying with the law, California State University policy, and best practices in regards to sexual harassment policy.

(b) (1) The California State University shall submit an initial report on or before July 1, 2025, and a final report on or before December 1, 2026, to the Legislature, the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, the Joint Legislative Audit Committee, and the Senate Committee on Education on the status of implementing the California State Auditor recommendations,
 including, if completed at the time of the report, any summarized results from the campus compliance reviews conducted pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), and identification of any systemic issues the California State University has in meeting the recommendations of the California State Auditor Report 2022-109, dated July 18, 2023.

(2) The final report required pursuant to paragraph (1) may be included as part of the annual report required by Section 66282.

(3) Reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Chancellor’s office” means the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(2) “Sexual harassment” means the same as defined in Section 66262.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 86, Sec. 1.   (AB 1790)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Rules of Student Conduct [66300. - 66303.]

66300.

(a) The Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, and the governing board of every community college district, shall adopt or provide for the adoption of specific rules and regulations governing student behavior along with applicable penalties for violation of the rules and regulations. The institutions shall adopt procedures by which all students are informed of these rules and regulations, with applicable penalties, and any revisions thereof.

(b) In adopting the rules and regulations governing student behavior pursuant to subdivision (a), the Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University
 shall place in the highest priority the health, safety, and well-being of the campus community and shall, on or before July 1, 2026, adopt, or provide for the adoption of, rules and regulations governing student behavior as follows: 

(1) Students receiving medical treatment for the personal use of drugs or alcohol shall not be subject to disciplinary action with respect to the use of drugs or alcohol in violation of
 the rules and regulations governing student behavior adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) if they complete an appropriate rehabilitation program, as described in subdivision (d). 

(2) Students described in paragraph (1) who violate rules and regulations
 for drug or alcohol
 use shall be offered the chance to complete an appropriate rehabilitation program, as described in subdivision (d).

(c) Subdivision (b) shall not apply to students who receive medical treatment for personal use of drugs or alcohol and are subject to a disciplinary sanction or sanctions for additional violations of rules and regulations governing student behavior adopted pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) In order for the prohibition on disciplinary action pursuant to subdivision (b) to apply to a student related to that student’s violation of the institution’s rules and regulations on drug and alcohol use, the student shall,
 pursuant to Section 1011i of Title 20 of the United States Code, be required to participate in an appropriate rehabilitation program within the timeframe set by the campus administrator overseeing student disciplinary actions. If the student does not complete the appropriate rehabilitation program, they shall be subject to disciplinary action in accordance with the institution’s rules and regulations governing student behavior.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the institution from including information
 about the appropriate rehabilitation program completed pursuant to subdivision (d) and the exemption from disciplinary action provided pursuant to subdivision (b) in a student’s administrative file.

(f) The prohibition on disciplinary action for drug and alcohol use described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and the requirement that the student be offered the chance to complete an appropriate rehabilitation program, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), shall only
 apply to a student once in an academic
 semester, quarter, or term, as defined by the campus. For subsequent violations of rules and regulations related to drug and alcohol use in the same academic semester, quarter, or term, the institution shall subject the student to disciplinary proceedings, at the conclusion of which the institution may impose disciplinary action or offer the student the chance to complete an appropriate rehabilitation program, as that term is described in subdivision (d). 

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature for a campus of the California State University and the University of California to provide restorative justice practices for disciplinary proceedings for violations of the institution’s rules and regulations related to drug
 and alcohol
 use, when deemed appropriate based on the totality of circumstances.

(h) This section does not in any way modify or affect the requirements under state or federal law for the reporting of crimes that occur on campus as it pertains to drug possession, drug manufacturing, drug distribution, and drug use. 

(i) For purposes of this section, “appropriate rehabilitation program” means an appropriate counseling, treatment, rehabilitation, or other diversion program, and may include, but is not limited to, participating in meetings with a school counselor or attending a drug education group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 159, Sec. 1.   (AB 602)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66301.

(a) Neither the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, the governing board of a community college district, nor an administrator of any campus of those institutions, shall make or enforce a rule subjecting a student to disciplinary sanction solely on the basis of conduct that is speech or other communication that, when engaged in outside a campus of those institutions, is protected from governmental restriction by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(b) A student enrolled in an institution, as specified in subdivision (a), at the time that the institution has made or enforced a rule in violation of subdivision (a) may commence a civil action to obtain appropriate injunctive and declaratory relief as determined by the court. Upon a motion, a court may award attorney’s fees to a prevailing plaintiff in a civil action pursuant to this section.

(c) This section does not authorize a prior restraint of student speech or the student press.

(d) This section does not prohibit the imposition of discipline for harassment, threats, or intimidation, unless constitutionally protected.

(e) This section does not prohibit an institution from adopting rules and regulations that are designed to prevent hate violence, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4 of Chapter 1363 of the Statutes of 1992, from being directed at students in a manner that denies them their full participation in the educational process, if the rules and regulations conform to standards established by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution for citizens generally.

(f) An employee shall not be dismissed, suspended, disciplined, reassigned, transferred, or otherwise retaliated against solely for acting to protect a student engaged in conduct authorized under this section, or refusing to infringe upon conduct that is protected by this section, the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, or Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 525, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

66302.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University and the governing board of each community college district shall adopt and publish policies on harassment, intimidation, and bullying, and shall include these policies within the rules and regulations governing student behavior within their respective segments of public postsecondary education.

 (b) It is the intent of the Legislature that rules and regulations governing student conduct be published, at a minimum, on the
 internet website of each public postsecondary educational campus and as part of any printed material covering those rules and regulations within the respective public postsecondary education system.

(c) The University of California is requested to comply with this section. This section shall apply to the University of California only to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make it applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 490, Sec. 4.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66302.5.

The Trustees of the California State University shall provide, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to provide, as a part of established campus orientations, educational and preventive information about cyberbullying to students at all campuses of their respective segments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (SB 366)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66303.

For purposes of promoting peaceful campus demonstrations, the Trustees of the California State University shall require each campus of the California State University to designate an individual to serve as a liaison between campus law enforcement agencies and students exercising rights guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution
 or Section 2 of Article I of
 the California Constitution, or both. The Regents of the University of California are requested to designate an individual at each campus of the University of California to serve as a liaison between campus law enforcement agencies and students exercising rights guaranteed by the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 2 of Article I of the California Constitution, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   (AB 1955)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.1. Stop Campus Hazing Act [66305. - 66309.]

66305.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Stop Campus Hazing Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66306.

Unless the context otherwise requires, for purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Affiliated” means currently recognized or sanctioned by the educational institution through its official student organization application process. For purposes of this chapter, an organization that had previously been recognized or sanctioned by the educational institution but has subsequently had that recognition or sanction withdrawn
 or revoked by the educational institution shall not be considered affiliated.

(b) “Educational institution” means a public or private institution of higher education in the state. The term includes the officers, employees, or governing bodies of the institution, when acting in their official capacity.

(c) “Hazing” means any method of initiation or preinitiation into an affiliated student
 organization or student body,
 which the initiator knows or should have known is likely to cause serious bodily injury to any former, current, or prospective student of any school, community college, college, university, or other educational institution in this state. The term “hazing” does not include customary athletic events or school-sanctioned events.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66307.

No person shall be subjected to hazing in any program or activity conducted by any educational institution that receives, or benefits from, state financial assistance or enrolls students who receive state student financial aid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66308.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2026, a former, current, or prospective student, against whom hazing is directed and who has suffered injury as a result, may commence a civil action for damages. In addition to bringing an action against any participants in the hazing or the organization pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 245.6 of the Penal Code, an action may be brought against any educational institution for the hazing practice of the organization involving one or more students if all of the following apply:

(1) The educational institution had direct involvement in the hazing practice of the organization, or knew or should have known of the hazing practice and failed to take reasonable steps to prevent the hazing practice of the organization.

(2) At the time of the alleged hazing incident, the organization involved in the hazing is affiliated with the educational institution.

(3) The alleged hazing incident occurred on or after January 1, 2026.

(b) For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), there shall be a rebuttable presumption that an educational institution took reasonable steps to prevent the hazing practice of the organization if the educational institution has all of the following:

(1) (A) Rules and regulations governing student behavior that include a prohibition on hazing, anonymous reporting of hazing incidents, and disciplinary actions for the violation of the hazing prohibition.

(B) Procedures by which all students are informed of the rules and regulations, with applicable penalties, and any revisions to the rules and regulations.

(2) (A) Rules and regulations governing employee behavior that include a prohibition on hazing and disciplinary actions for the violation of the hazing prohibition.

(B) Procedures by which all employees are informed of the rules and regulations, with applicable penalties, and any revisions to the rules and regulations.

(3) (A) A comprehensive prevention and outreach program addressing hazing. The comprehensive prevention program shall include components on identifying hazing, hazing prevention, and bystander intervention strategies. An outreach program shall be provided to inform students of the educational
 institution’s policy on the prohibition on hazing, and, at a minimum, include a process for contacting and informing the student body, athletic programs, and affiliated student organizations about the educational institution’s overall prohibition on hazing policy. For purposes of this paragraph, “comprehensive prevention and outreach program” includes, but is not limited to, providing information to students about all of the following:

(i) Hazing awareness, prevention, and the educational institution’s policy on the prohibition on hazing.

(ii) Campus policies and resources relating to hazing, including how to report hazing to the appropriate campus personnel, which includes anonymous reporting.

(iii) A focus on prevention and bystander intervention training as it relates to hazing.

(B) The comprehensive prevention and outreach program to address hazing shall be part of every incoming student’s orientation and shall be offered annually to the following campus-affiliated organizations:

(i) Athletic teams.

(ii) Affiliated sororities and fraternities.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, nothing in this section affects existing rights, obligations, and remedies under Section 245.6 of the Penal Code.

(d) The duties and obligations imposed by this chapter are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under any other law and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under any other law, and do not limit any
 rights or remedies under existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 64.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66309.

(a) On or before June 30, 2026, and on or before June 30 of each year thereafter, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and each independent institution of higher education that is a “qualifying institution,” as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, shall report to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature the number of hazing incidents that constituted a violation of the institution of higher education’s policy prohibiting
 hazing and whether the violation was affiliated with a student organization. The report shall be disaggregated by campus.

(b) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, a report required pursuant to this section shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(c) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Hazing” means any method of initiation or preinitiation into
 an affiliated
 student organization or student body,
 which the initiator knows or should have known is likely to cause serious bodily injury to any former, current, or prospective student of any school, community college, college, university, or other educational institution in this state. “Hazing” does not include customary athletic events or school-sanctioned events.

(2) “Student organization” means either of the following:

(A) A
 conference-based competitive program at the institution of higher education.

(B) A sorority or fraternity that has officially met the formal chartering and recognition requirements at the institution of higher education where it operates and remains in good standing at the time of the alleged hazing incident.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 704, Sec. 2.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.2. Campus-Recognized Sorority and Fraternity Transparency Act [66310. - 66312.]

66310.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Campus-Recognized Sorority and Fraternity Transparency Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.   (AB 524)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66312.

(a) As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Academic year” has the same meaning as in Section 69432.7.

(2) (A) “Campus-recognized sorority or fraternity” means a sorority or fraternity that has officially met the formal chartering and recognition requirements at the institution where it operates.

(B) As used in this chapter, this definition does not include a collegiate honor society.

(3) “Chapter house” means any residence located on or off
 campus that is owned by the institution of higher education but occupied by a campus-recognized sorority or fraternity, or any residence located on or off campus that is owned and occupied by the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity.

(4) “Institution of higher education” or “institution” means a campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, or the University of California, a private postsecondary educational institution, or an independent institution of higher education. 

(5) “Misconduct” means any conduct in violation of institutional policies reportable under Section
 1092(f)(1)(F)(i)(II) and (IX) of Title 20 of the United States Code, as it read on January 1, 2022, or hazing as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 245.6 of the Penal Code.

(6) “Participating sorority or fraternity” means a sorority or fraternity described in subdivision (c).

(7) “Sanctioned event” means any event in which one of the following occurs:

(A) The institution deems the event to be sanctioned by a fraternity or sorority according to their campus policies and practices.

(B) The name of a campus-recognized sorority or fraternity or participating sorority or fraternity is used to market or publicize the event.

(C) The name of a campus-recognized sorority or fraternity or participating sorority or fraternity is displayed at the event.

(D) Official funds of a campus-recognized sorority or fraternity or participating sorority or fraternity are used for the purchase and reimbursement of food, beverages, supplies, venue-related costs, publicity, party rentals, damages or cleanup fees, or any other costs associated with the event.

(E) A campus-recognized sorority or fraternity or participating sorority or fraternity, or a benefactor officially affiliated with the
 sorority or fraternity, receives any portion of funds raised from attendance fees, ticket sales, or other forms of admission fees associated with the event.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 67400, each institution of higher education shall include in the institution’s requirements for campus recognition of each campus-recognized sorority or fraternity, both of the following requirements:

(1) (A) A requirement that the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity shall submit to the institution on or before July 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, all of the following:

(i) The number of active members in the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity.

(ii) The number of new members added to the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity.

(iii) The average grade point average of the membership of the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity.

(iv) The average grade point average of new members of the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity.

(v) The number of community service hours the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity completed as an organization.

(vi) The total amount of money fundraised by the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity.

(vii) The current recognition status of the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity, as
 determined by the institution.

(viii) The current conduct status of the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity, as determined by the institution.

(ix) The addresses of all chapter houses affiliated with the campus-recognized sorority or fraternity.

(x) The location, date, and time of any sanctioned event.

(xi) Any additional information the institution may require.

(B) Unless otherwise specified, the information collected pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be for the academic year immediately preceding the reporting deadline.

(2) A
 requirement that any campus-recognized sorority or fraternity that does not comply with paragraph (1) be suspended from campus recognition.

(c) A sorority or fraternity that satisfies both of the following is encouraged to comply with the reporting requirements of subdivision (b):

(1) The sorority or fraternity has more than 50 percent of its members enrolled at the institution of higher education.

(2) The sorority or fraternity is not recognized as an affiliated sorority or fraternity of the institution by the official authorizing body of that institution.

(d) (1) (A) The institution shall compile and maintain the information
 collected pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) into a publicly accessible report published on each campus Greek Life internet homepage or its equivalent in a prominent location on or before October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter. The report shall include a list of available mental health resources and the residence addresses of all campus-recognized sorority and fraternity chapter houses. Each annual report shall be available on the campus Greek Life internet homepage or its equivalent for a minimum of 10 years.

(B) The institution shall send the report for the academic year immediately preceding the reporting deadline through a campuswide email to all enrolled students on or before October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter.

(2) An institution that does not have any
 campus-recognized sorority or fraternity or participating sorority or fraternity shall be exempt from the reporting requirement of this subdivision.

(3) The institution of higher education shall include in the annual report the following for each campus-recognized sorority and fraternity and participating sorority or fraternity described in subdivision (c) for the academic year immediately preceding the reporting deadline:

(A) The number of citations, or disciplinary actions taken, relating to misconduct at a chapter house or sanctioned event.

(B) The addresses of chapter houses and sanctioned events and names of sororities and fraternities where misconduct occurred.

(4) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, a report required pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with all applicable state and federal privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 268, Sec. 1.   (AB 524)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Business Ethics [66350. - 66353.]

66350.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Social Responsibility Business Leadership Initiative Act of 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 599, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

66351.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Ethics in business are vital to the economic well-being of the state.

(b) Corporate malfeasance is contrary to the long-term economic viability of the state.

(c) California’s public and private higher education institutions have the opportunity to act as a catalyst in creating a new generation of elite business leaders that work to create a sustainable, ethical, and socially responsible global community.

(d) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to establish the Social Responsibility Business Leadership Initiative to prepare and inspire California business graduates to apply their business skills to enhance the productivity of the state, and integrate the discipline of corporate responsibility into the general management core.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 599, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

66353.

(a) The Golden State Business and Social Responsibility Award is hereby established. The award shall honor students who complete graduate business programs at California’s public and private institutions of higher education, and show a commitment to socially responsible leadership.

(b) A participating institution of higher education may affix the seal of the Senate, the Assembly, or the Governor on the diploma or transcript of a qualifying student.

(c) A student who meets both of the following requirements shall qualify for an award:

(1) The completion of two ethics courses in business.

(2) The demonstration of a commitment to social responsibility by completing a minimum of 50 hours of community service.

(d) Institutional participation in the Golden State Business and Social Responsibility awards is voluntary. An institution of higher education shall be responsible for any costs it incurs in participating in the award program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 599, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.7. Gene Synthesis Providers [66360. - 66361.]

66360.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms apply:

(a) “Gene synthesis equipment” means equipment needed to produce gene synthesis products that is not readily used for any other purpose.

(b) “Gene synthesis product” is double-stranded DNA (dsDNA),
 double-stranded nucleic acids, RNA, or oligonucleotides, designed and created without an existing DNA template.

(c) (1) “Gene synthesis provider” means an entity that does any of the following:

(A) An entity that creates gene synthesis products for delivery to a customer.

(B) A distributor of gene synthesis products, including, but not limited to, entities who manufacture gene synthesis products for use by other parties, both inside
 and outside of the entity.

(C) A third-party entity that is not the end user of a gene synthesis product and does not make gene synthesis products, but otherwise fills, completes, modifies, or purifies gene synthesis products.

(2) “Gene synthesis provider” does not include a research scientist making gene synthesis products for the research scientist’s own use or for use by another research scientist or an entity that manufactures gene synthesis products for the entity’s own use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (AB 1963)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66361.

(a) The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, develop systemwide guidance for purchasing gene synthesis equipment or gene synthesis products from gene synthesis providers who prevent the misuse of synthetic genes and safeguard the benefits of gene synthesis technology while minimizing risk.

(b) The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, consider including International Gene Synthesis Consortium (IGSC) criteria in their guidance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (AB 1963)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Academic Materials [66400. - 66410.]

66400.

No person shall prepare, offer to prepare, cause to be prepared, sell, or otherwise distribute any term paper, thesis, dissertation, or other written material for another person, for a fee or other compensation, with the knowledge, or under circumstances in which he should reasonably have known, that such term paper, thesis, dissertation, or other written material is to be submitted by any other person for academic credit at any public or private college, university, or other institution of higher learning in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66401.

No person shall make or disseminate, with the intent to induce any other person to enter into any obligation relating thereto, any statement, written or oral, that he will prepare, cause to be prepared, sell, or otherwise distribute any term paper, thesis, dissertation, or other written material, for a fee or other compensation, for or on behalf of any person who has been assigned the written preparation of such term paper, thesis, dissertation, or other written material for academic credit at any public or private college, university, or other institution of higher learning in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66402.

Any court of competent jurisdiction is hereby authorized to grant such relief as is necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter, including the issuance of an injunction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66403.

Actions for injunction under the provisions of this chapter may be brought in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of any person, or in the name of any public or private college, university, or other institution of higher learning, acting for the interest of itself, its students, or the general public.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66404.

The provisions of this chapter are not exclusive. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preempt or in any other way limit, diminish, or imply the absence of rights of any party, public or private, against any person in connection with any of the acts described in Section 66400 or Section 66401.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66405.

As used in this chapter, “person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or association.

As used in this chapter, “prepare” means to put into condition for intended use. “Prepare” does not include the mere typing or assembling of papers, nor the mere furnishing of information or research.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 97.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

66406.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the production and pricing of college textbooks deserves a high level of attention from educators and lawmakers because they impact the quality and affordability of higher education.

(b) Consistent with Section 133 of Title I of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1015b), the state urges textbook publishers to do all of the following:

(1) “Unbundle” the
 instructional materials to give students the option of buying textbooks, CD-ROMs, and workbooks “à la carte” or without additional materials.

(2) Post in a prominent location on the publishers’ Internet Web sites, where it is readily available to college faculty, students, and departments, both of the following types of information:

(A) A list of all of the different products they sell, including both bundled and unbundled options, and the net price of each product.
